Hawaii statutes.
[§302D-3.5] Rules. Unless
otherwise provided for in this chapter or chapter 302A, the commission may
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to administer and implement this chapter;
provided that the board shall maintain exclusive rule-making authority over
state educational policy. [L 2013, c 159, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next